Hawaii statutes.
§334-124 Hearing date. The family
court shall set a hearing date on a petition as soon as possible. [L 1984, c
251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §10; am L 2015, c 231, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next